v1.1/old/guesser.lexc
! -----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Loc][4SgPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmini        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Loc][4SgPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmini      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Loc][4SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmini      EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Sg possessor |
[N][Loc][4PlPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmeggni      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Loc][4PlPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmeggni    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Loc][4PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmeggni    EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Pl possessor |
[N][Loc][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmegni       EncliticOrEnd; [N][Loc][4DuPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmegni     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Loc][4DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmegni     EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Du possessor |
[N][Loc][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmegteni     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Loc][4DuPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmegteni   EncliticOrEnd; [N][Loc][4DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmegteni   EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Du possessor |
! -----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|


! ------------------------------------------------------|
!            Terminalis Case Endings (to N)             | 
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|
!                   singular possessed                  |                      plural possessed                 |                          dual possessed                      |
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Ter][Unpd][Sg]:~f-wmun                 EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][Unpd][Pl]:~f-w/-wnun            EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][Unpd][Du]:~sf-w%:(e)gnun               EncliticOrEnd; ! unpossessed   |
! ------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Ter][3SgPoss][SgPosd]:~%:(ng₁)anun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][3SgPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)anun   EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][3SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gkenun      EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Sg possessor |
[N][Ter][3PlPoss][SgPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itnun    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][3PlPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itnun  EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][3PlPoss][DuPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itnun         EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Pl possessor |
[N][Ter][3DuPoss][SgPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gkenun EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][3DuPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itnun  EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][3DuPoss][DuPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itnun         EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Du possessor |
! ------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Ter][1SgPoss][SgPosd]:–mnun            EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][1SgPoss][PlPosd]:–mnun          EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][1SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemnun      EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Sg possessor |
[N][Ter][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:–mnnun           EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][1PlPoss][PlPosd]:–mnnun         EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][1PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemnnun     EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Pl possessor |
[N][Ter][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:–mtegnun         EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][1DuPoss][PlPosd]:–mtegnun       EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][1DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemtegnun   EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Du possessor |
! ------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Ter][2SgPoss][SgPosd]:–gpenun          EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][2SgPoss][PlPosd]:–gpenun        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][2SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpenun      EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Sg possessor |
[N][Ter][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:–gpesinun        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][2PlPoss][PlPosd]:–gpesinun      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][2PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpesinun    EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Pl possessor |
[N][Ter][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:–gpetegnun       EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][2DuPoss][PlPosd]:–gpetegnun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][2DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpetegnun   EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Du possessor |
! ------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Ter][4SgPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wminun        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][4SgPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wminun      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][4SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gminun      EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Sg possessor |
[N][Ter][4PlPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmeggnun      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][4PlPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmeggnun    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][4PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmeggnun    EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Pl possessor |
[N][Ter][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmegnun       EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][4DuPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmegnun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][4DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmegnun     EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Du possessor |
[N][Ter][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmegtenun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][4DuPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmegtenun   EncliticOrEnd; [N][Ter][4DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmegtenun   EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Du possessor |
! ------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|


! -------------------------------------------------------|
!              Vialis Case Endings (through N)           |
! --------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|
!                  singular possessed                    |                      plural possessed                  |                           dual possessed                      |
! --------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|---------------- -|
[N][Via][Unpd][Sg]:~h-wkun                  EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][Unpd][Pl]:~sf-w%:(e)tgun/teggun  EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][Unpd][Du]:~sf-w%:(e)gnegun               EncliticOrEnd; ! unpossessed   |
! -------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Via][3SgPoss][SgPosd]:~%:(ng₁)akun      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][3SgPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)akun    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][3SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gkenkun       EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Sg possessor |
[N][Via][3PlPoss][SgPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itgun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][3PlPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itgun   EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][3PlPoss][DuPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itgun           EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Pl possessor |
[N][Via][3DuPoss][SgPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gkenkun EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][3DuPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)akun    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][3DuPoss][DuPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itgun           EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Via][1SgPoss][SgPosd]:–mkun             EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][1SgPoss][PlPosd]:–mkun           EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][1SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemkun        EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Sg possessor |
[N][Via][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:–mteggun          EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][1PlPoss][PlPosd]:–mteggun        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][1PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemteggun     EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Pl possessor |
[N][Via][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:–mtegnegun        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][1DuPoss][PlPosd]:–mtegnegun      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][1DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemtegnegun   EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Via][2SgPoss][SgPosd]:–gpekun           EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][2SgPoss][PlPosd]:–gpegun         EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][2SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpegun        EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Sg possessor |
[N][Via][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:–gpesigun         EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][2PlPoss][PlPosd]:–gpesigun       EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][2PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpesigun      EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Pl possessor |
[N][Via][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:–gpetegnegun      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][2DuPoss][PlPosd]:–gpetegnegun    EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][2DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gpetegnegun   EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Via][4SgPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmikun         EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][4SgPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmikun       EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][4SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmikun        EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Sg possessor |
[N][Via][4PlPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmegteggun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][4PlPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmegteggun   EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][4PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmegteggun    EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Pl possessor |
[N][Via][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:~f-wmegtegnegun   EncliticOrEnd; [N][Via][4DuPoss][PlPosd]:~f-wmegtegnegun EncliticOrEnd;  [N][Via][4DuPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gmegtegnegun EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|


! ------------------------------------------------------|
!             Equalis Case Endings (like N)             |
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|
!                  singular possessed                   |                     plural possessed                |                          dual possessed                      |
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Equ][Unpd][Sg]:~f-wtun                 EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][Unpd][Pl]:~sf-w%:(e)stun      EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][Unpd][Du]:~sf-w%:(e)gestun             EncliticOrEnd; ! unpossessed   |
! ------------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Equ][3SgPoss][SgPosd]:~%:(ng₁)atun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][3SgPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)atun EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][3SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gketun      EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Sg possessor |
[N][Equ][3PlPoss][SgPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][3PlPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itun EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][3PlPoss][DuPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itun          EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Pl possessor |
[N][Equ][3DuPoss][SgPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gketun EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][3DuPoss][PlPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itun EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][3DuPoss][DuPosd]:~%:(ng₁)itun          EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Du possessor |
! ------------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[N][Equ][1SgPoss][SgPosd]:–mtun            EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][1SgPoss][PlPosd]:–mtun        EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][1SgPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemtun      EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Sg possessor |
[N][Equ][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:–mtestun         EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][1PlPoss][PlPosd]:–mtestun     EncliticOrEnd; [N][Equ][1PlPoss][DuPosd]:~sf-w%:(e)gemtestun   EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Pl possessor |
